Massachusetts, session 194th, H1719.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 269 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following new
section:
Section 20: A parent, legal guardian or caretaker who willfully fails to contact law
enforcement or emergency personnel concerning the safety of a minor child, 16 years of age or
younger, in his or her care whose whereabouts has not been ascertained within the past 48 hours
shall be punished by imprisonment in state prison for not more than five years.
A parent, legal guardian or caretaker of a minor child, 16 years of age or younger, who
has knowledge of the death of said child, and who fails to notify law enforcement or emergency
personnel of said death within one hour of their knowledge of the occurrence, shall be punishable
by imprisonment in state prison for not more than five years, or by a fine of not more than ten
of 2

thousand dollars and imprisonment in a house of correction for not more than two and one half
years.
of 2